North Carolina, session 2025, HB573.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-269.15(a) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-269.25(g) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-270.15 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(d) Article 17E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-270.15A. Prohibition on examination requirements.
The State Board of Education shall not adopt any rules or policies requiring any applicant for
a teacher license pursuant to G.S. 115C-270.20 to complete a standardized examination as a
condition for receiving a teacher license."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-270.20(4a) reads as rewritten:
"(4a) Limited license. – A three-year renewable license issued to an individual who
meets the requirements of this subdivision. A limited license shall only be
requested by the local board of education currently employing or seeking to
employ the individual and shall be used for continued employment only in
that local school administrative unit. The State Board shall not require
individuals to demonstrate preparation through achieving a prescribed
minimum score on a standardized examination for a limited license. To
receive a limited license, one of the following shall be met:
a. In-state licensee. – Both of the following are met:
1. The individual was issued an IPL or RL, but failed to fulfill
examination requirements under G.S. 115C-270.15 licensure
requirements adopted by the State Board after three years of
licensure.
2. The local board of education submits to the State Board an
affidavit stating that the teacher is currently employed by that
local board, is an effective teacher, and will be encouraged to
continue to pursue a CPL. The affidavit shall be signed by both
*H573-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the principal and superintendent for the school to which the
teacher is currently assigned.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to anyone
applying for a teacher license on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 573-First Edition